samples/Hunspell.Sample/dictionaries/test.aff
# Test affix file for Hunspell.NET
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ

# Simple suffix rule for plurals
SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 s .

# Simple prefix rule for negative
PFX N Y 1
PFX N 0 un .
